Utah statutes.
41-6a-907.   Vehicles emerging from alleys, buildings, private roads, or driveways must stop prior to sidewalk area or street.

The operator of a vehicle emerging from an alley, building, private road or driveway within a business or residence district shall stop:

(1)  the vehicle immediately prior to driving onto a sidewalk or onto the sidewalk area extending across the alley, building, private road, or driveway; or

(2)  if there is no sidewalk area, at the point nearest the street to be entered where the operator has a view of approaching traffic.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 26, 2005 General Session

